District of Columbia statutes.
8-1031.09

Enforcement training.

The Mayor shall ensure that training designed for employees who enforce the District’s waste laws and regulations addresses the requirements of this chapter and the policies established by the Interagency Waste Reduction Working Group pursuant to § 8-1031.08.

History

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 109, 61 DCR 9971